Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5999XS (2) 91 lh/jh S.F. 2242 Section 1. Section 558.1B, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. âSingle-family residenceâ means an 3 existing or newly built residential dwelling designed for 4 occupancy by one household and located on property zoned for 5 single-family residential use, including a detached dwelling 6 or townhouse, but excluding duplexes, multifamily dwellings, 7 and condominiums. 8 Sec. 2. Section 558.41, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 9 following new subsection: 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. Radon compliance affidavit. A county 11 recorder shall not record a deed conveying a single-family 12 residence unless the deed is accompanied by a sworn affidavit 13 executed by the grantor and grantee affirming that the 14 acquisition complies with section 558.73. 15 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 558.73 Radon testing and mitigation 16 for single-family residences. 17 1. Prior to the conveyance of a single-family residence, 18 the grantor shall conduct a radon test for the residence in 19 accordance with the rules adopted by the department of health 20 and human services. 21 2. a. If a radon test conducted pursuant to subsection 22 1 indicated radon concentrations at or above the level at 23 which mitigation is recommended by the federal environmental 24 protection agency, the grantor shall install a radon mitigation 25 system prior to conveyance. The grantor shall then perform an 26 additional radon test to verify that radon levels are not above 27 the levels recommended by the federal environmental protection 28 agency. 29 b. If a radon mitigation system is present in the 30 single-family residence at the time of sale, but is not 31 functioning, the grantor shall repair or replace the radon 32 mitigation system prior to conveyance. 33 3. The grantor and grantee shall execute a sworn affidavit 34 stating the conveyance complies with this section and that the 35 -1- LSB 5999XS (2) 91 lh/jh 1/ 2 S.F. 2242 latest radon test showed a radon level at or below the level 1 recommended by the federal environmental protection agency. 2 4. The department of health and human services shall adopt 3 rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section. 4 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to conveyances 5 occurring on or after the effective date of this Act. 6